California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, and 706.105 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may serve earnings withholding orders for taxes and any other notice or document required to be served or provided in connection with an earnings withholding order for taxes according to Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure to government and private employers by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(b) Upon consent of the employer, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may
 provide service by electronic transmission or other electronic technology under this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, 706.125, and 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may receive the employer’s return, as described in Section 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(d) This section shall apply in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if this section had been incorporated in full into Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) This
 section shall apply to notices served or provided on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 17.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Administration [40171. - 40216.]



  ARTICLE 1. Regulations, Records and Reports [40171. - 40177.4.]

40171.

The board shall enforce the provisions of this part and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part. The board may prescribe the extent to which any ruling or regulation shall be applied without retroactive effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40172.

Every electric utility engaged in generating, purchasing, transmitting, distributing, consuming or selling electrical energy in this state shall keep such records pertaining thereto in such form as the board may prescribe by rule or regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40173.

Every electric utility shall keep and maintain such records of meter readings and other records as may be necessary for the accurate determination of the kilowatt-hours of electrical energy generated, purchased, consumed or sold by it in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40174.

The board or its authorized representative may make such examination of the records, meters and equipment of any person generating, transmitting, distributing, consuming, purchasing or selling electrical energy and such other investigations as it may deem necessary in carrying out the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40175.

In addition to any other reports or returns required under this part, the board may by rule or otherwise require additional, supplemental or other reports from electric utilities, consumers, and any other person generating, purchasing, transmitting, distributing or consuming electrical energy, including verification of the information to be given on and the times for filing of such reports. For the purpose of carrying out its duties under Article 2 (commencing with Section 40031) of Chapter 2 of this part, the board may require such reports of estimates of future availability, generation, sales and consumption of electrical energy from such electric utilities and other
 persons as it may deem necessary. The board shall have full access to records of the Public Utilities Commission, and any political subdivision or public agency of this state that regulates, operates or owns an electric utility, which pertain to the generation, transmission, distribution, sale, purchase or consumption of electrical energy in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40176.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who is engaged in the business of preparing, or providing services in connection with the preparation of, returns under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 40051), or any person who for compensation prepares any such return for any other person, and who knowingly or recklessly does either of the following, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned no more than one year, or both, together with
 the costs of prosecution:

(1) Discloses any information furnished to him or her for, or in connection with, the preparation of the return.

(2) Uses that information for any purpose other than to prepare, or assist in preparing, the return.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to disclosure of information if that disclosure is made pursuant to the person’s consent or pursuant to a subpoena, court order, or other compulsory legal process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

40177.

(a) The board shall determine which electric utility’s accounts are eligible for the managed audit program in a manner that is consistent with the efficient use of its auditing resources and the maximum effectiveness of the program.

(b) An electric utility is not required to participate in the managed audit program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 21.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

40177.1.

An electric utility’s account is eligible for the managed audit program only if the electric utility meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The electric utility’s business involves few or no statutory exemptions.

(b) The electric utility’s business involves a single or small number of clearly defined taxability issues.

(c) The electric utility is subject to this part and agrees to participate in the managed audit program.

(d) The electric utility has the resources to comply with the managed audit instructions provided by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 22.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

40177.2.

(a) If the board selects an electric utility’s account for a managed audit, all of the following apply:

(1) The board shall identify all of the following:

(A) The audit period covered by the managed audit.

(B) The types of transactions covered by the managed audit.

(C) The specific procedures that the electric utility is to follow in determining any liability.

(D) The records to be reviewed by the electric utility.

(E) The manner in which the types of transactions are to be scheduled for review.

(F) The time period for completion of the managed audit.

(G) The time period for the payment of the liability and interest.

(H) Any other criteria that the board may require for completion of the managed audit.

(2) The electric utility shall:

(A) Examine its records,
 meters, and equipment to determine if it has any unreported tax liability for the audit period.

(B) Make available to the board for verification all computations and records, meters, and equipment examined pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(b) The information provided by the electric utility pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is the same information that is required for the completion of any other audit that the board may conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 23.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

40177.3.

Nothing in the article limits the board’s authority to examine the records, meters, and equipment of an electric utility under Section 40174.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 24.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

40177.4.

Upon completion of the managed audit and verification by the board, interest on any unpaid liability shall be computed at one-half the rate that would otherwise be imposed for liabilities covered by the audit period. Payment of the liabilities and interest shall be made within the time period specified by the board. If the requirements for the managed audit are not satisfied, the board may proceed to examine the records of the electric utility in a manner to be determined by the
 board under law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 25.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Disposition of Proceeds [40181. - 40182.]

40181.

All amounts required to be paid to the state under this part shall be paid to the board in the form of remittances payable to State Board of Equalization of the State of California. The board shall transmit the payments to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Energy Resources Surcharge Fund, which fund is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40182.

All money deposited in the Energy Resources Surcharge Fund under this part shall upon order of the Controller be drawn therefrom and transferred to pay the refunds authorized by this part. The balance shall be transferred to the Energy Resources Programs Account, which is hereby created in the General Fund.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the funds in the Energy Resources Programs Account be used for ongoing energy programs and energy projects deemed appropriate by the Legislature, including, but not limited to, the activities of the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, all appropriations from the Energy Resources Programs Account shall be made by the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1067, Sec. 9.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Violations [40186. - 40188.]

40186.

Any person who fails or refuses to file a return or report required to be made or who fails or refuses to furnish a supplemental report or other data required by the board, or who renders a false or fraudulent report is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40187.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, any person who violates this part with intent to defeat or evade the determination of an amount due required by law to be made is guilty of a felony when the amount of tax liability aggregates twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more in any 12-consecutive-month period. The determination shall be approved by the executive director or his or her designee. Each offense shall be punished by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or
 imprisonment for 16 months, two years, or three years, or by both the fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40188.

Any prosecution for violation of any of the penal provisions of this part shall be instituted within three years after commission of the offense or within two years after the violation is discovered, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1361, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Notices [40191. - 40191.]

40191.

A certificate by the board or an employee of the board stating that a notice required by this part was given by mailing or personal service shall be prima facie evidence in any administrative or judicial proceeding of the fact and regularity of the mailing of personal service in accordance with any requirement of this part for the giving of notice. Unless otherwise specifically required, any notice required by this part to be mailed or served may be given by mailing or personal service in the manner provided for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. The California Taxpayers’ Bill of Rights [40200. - 40216.]

40200.

The board shall administer this article. Unless the context indicates otherwise, the provisions of this article shall apply to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40201.

(a) The board shall establish the position of the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate. The advocate or his or her designee shall be responsible for facilitating resolution of taxpayer complaints and problems, including any taxpayer complaints regarding unsatisfactory treatment of taxpayers by board employees, and staying actions where taxpayers have suffered or will suffer irreparable loss as the result of those actions. Applicable statutes of limitation shall be tolled during the pendency of a stay. Any penalties and interest that would otherwise
 accrue shall not be affected by the granting of a stay.

(b) The advocate shall report directly to the executive officer of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40202.

(a) The board shall develop and implement an education and information program directed at, but not limited to, all of the following groups:

(1) Taxpayers newly registered with the board.

(2) Board audit and compliance staff.

(b) The education and information program shall include all of the following:

(1) A program of written communication with newly registered taxpayers explaining in simplified terms their duties and responsibilities.

(2) Participation in seminars and similar programs organized by federal, state, and local agencies.

(3) Revision of taxpayer education materials currently produced by the board that explain the most common areas of taxpayer nonconformance in simplified terms.

(4) Implementation of a continuing education program for audit and compliance personnel to include the application of new legislation to taxpayer activities and areas of recurrent taxpayer noncompliance or inconsistency of administration.

(c) Electronic media used pursuant to this section shall not
 represent the voice, picture, or name of members of the board or of the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

40203.

The board shall conduct an annual hearing before the full board where industry representatives and individual taxpayers are allowed to present their proposals on changes to the Energy Resources Surcharge Law which may further improve voluntary compliance and the relationship between taxpayers and government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40204.

The board shall prepare and publish brief but comprehensive statements in simple and nontechnical language that explain procedures, remedies, and the rights and obligations of the board and taxpayers. As appropriate, statements shall be provided to taxpayers with the initial notice of audit, the notice of proposed additional taxes, any subsequent notice of tax due, or other substantive notices. Additionally, the board shall include this language for statements in the annual tax information bulletins that are mailed to taxpayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40205.

(a) The total amount of revenue collected or assessed pursuant to this part shall not be used for any of the following:

(1) To evaluate individual officers or employees.

(2) To impose or suggest production quotas or goals, other than quotas or goals with respect to accounts receivable.

(b) The board shall certify in its annual report submitted
 pursuant to Section 15616 of the Government Code that revenue collected or assessed is not used in a manner prohibited by subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the setting of goals and the evaluation of performance with respect to productivity and the efficient use of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40206.

The board shall develop and implement a program that will evaluate an individual employee’s or officer’s performance with respect to his or her contact with taxpayers. The development and implementation of the program shall be coordinated with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40207.

The board shall, in cooperation with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate, and other interested taxpayer-oriented groups, develop a plan to reduce the time required to resolve petitions for redetermination and claims for refunds. The plan shall include determination of standard timeframes and special review of cases which take more time than the appropriate standard timeframe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40208.

Procedures of the board, relating to appeals staff review conferences before a staff attorney of supervising tax auditor independent of the assessing department, shall include all of the following:

(a) Any conference shall be held at a reasonable time at a board office that is convenient to the taxpayer.

(b) The conference may be recorded only if prior notice is given to the taxpayer and the taxpayer is entitled to receive a copy of
 the recording.

(c) The taxpayer shall be informed prior to any conference that he or she has a right to have present at the conference his or her attorney, accountant, or other designated agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40209.

(a) Every taxpayer is entitled to be reimbursed for any reasonable fees and expenses related to a hearing before the board if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The taxpayer files a claim for the fee and expenses with the board within one year of the date the decision of the board becomes final.

(2) The board, in its sole discretion, finds that the action taken by the board staff was
 unreasonable.

(3) The board decides that the taxpayer be awarded a specific amount of fees and expenses related to the hearing, in an amount determined by the board in its sole discretion.

(b) To determine whether the board staff has been unreasonable, the board shall consider whether the board staff has established that its position was substantially justified.

(c) The amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to the following:

(1) Fees and expenses incurred after the date of the notice of determination, jeopardy determination, or a claim for refund.

(2) If the board finds that the staff was unreasonable with respect to certain issues but reasonable with respect to other
 issues, the amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to those that relate to the issues where the staff was unreasonable.

(d) Any proposed award by the board pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the award.

(e) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for claims filed on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

40210.

(a) An officer or employee of the board acting in connection with any law administered by the board shall not knowingly authorize, require, or conduct any investigation of, or surveillance over, any person for nontax administration related purposes.

(b) Any person violating subdivision (a) shall be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, including dismissal from office or discharge from employment.

(c) This section shall not apply with respect to any otherwise lawful investigation concerning organized crime activities.

(d) The provisions of this section are not intended to prohibit, restrict, or prevent the exchange of information where the person is being investigated for multiple violations which include energy resources surcharge violations.

(e) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Investigation” means any oral or written inquiry directed to any person, organization, or governmental agency.

(2) “Surveillance” means the monitoring of persons, places, or events by means of electronic interception, overt or covert observations, or photography, and the use of
 informants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40211.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department, its staff, and the Attorney General pursue settlements as authorized under this section with respect to surcharge matters in dispute that are the subject of protests, appeals, or refund claims, consistent with a reasonable evaluation of the costs and risks associated with litigation of these matters.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no recommendation of settlement shall be submitted to the director for approval unless and until that recommendation has been submitted by the chief counsel to the Attorney General. Within 30 days of receiving that recommendation,
 the Attorney General shall review the recommendation and advise the chief counsel, in writing, of their conclusions as to whether the recommendation is reasonable from an overall perspective. The chief counsel shall, with each recommendation of settlement submitted to the director, also submit the Attorney General’s written conclusions obtained pursuant to this paragraph.

(2) (A) A settlement of any civil surcharge matter in dispute involving a reduction of surcharge or penalties in settlement, the total of which reduction of surcharge and penalties in settlement does not exceed eleven thousand five hundred dollars ($11,500), may be approved by the director.

(B) Beginning on July 1, 2029, and each fifth fiscal year thereafter, the department shall
 adjust the amount specified in subparagraph (A) by increasing that amount by a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the Department of Finance with the resulting amount rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100). The first adjustment pursuant to this subparagraph shall be a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index from January 1, 2024, to January 1, 2029. Subsequent fifth fiscal year adjustments shall cover subsequent five-year periods. The incremental change shall be added to the previously adjusted amount.

(c) Whenever a reduction of surcharge, or penalties, or total surcharge and penalties in settlement in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved pursuant to this section, there shall be placed on file, for at least one
 year, in the office of the director of the department a public record with respect to that settlement. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name or names of the surcharge payers who are parties to the settlement.

(2) The total amount in dispute.

(3) The amount agreed to pursuant to the settlement.

(4) A summary of the reasons why the settlement is in the best interests of the State of California.

(5) (A) For any settlement approved by the
 director, except those settlements approved pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the Attorney General’s conclusion as to whether the recommendation of settlement was reasonable from an overall perspective.

(B) The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secret, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure that, if disclosed, would adversely affect the surcharge payer or the national defense.

(d) The director shall not participate in the settlement of surcharge matters pursuant to this section, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) (1) Any recommendation for settlement shall be approved or
 disapproved by the director within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation to the director. Any recommendation for settlement that is not either approved or disapproved by the director within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation shall be deemed approved.

(2) Where the
 director disapproves a recommendation for settlement, at the discretion of the director and chief counsel, the matter shall be remanded to staff for further negotiation, and may be resubmitted to the director, in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as the initial submission.

(f) All settlements entered into pursuant to this section shall be final and nonappealable, except upon a showing of fraud or misrepresentation with respect to a material fact.

(g) The Legislature finds that it is essential for fiscal purposes that the settlement program authorized by this section be expeditiously implemented. Accordingly, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any
 determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the department in implementing and administering the settlement program authorized by this section.

(h) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to any settlements approved on or after January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 18.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

40211.5.

(a) (1) Beginning on January 1, 2007, the executive director and chief counsel of the board, or their delegates, may compromise any final surcharge liability where the reduction of surcharges is seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) or less.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph
 (3), the board, upon recommendation by its executive director and chief counsel, jointly, may compromise a final surcharge liability involving a reduction in surcharges in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500). Any recommendation for approval of an offer in compromise that is not either approved or disapproved within 45 days of the submission of the recommendation shall be deemed approved.

(3) The board, itself, may by resolution delegate to the executive director and the chief counsel, jointly, the authority to compromise a final surcharge liability in which the reduction of surcharges is in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), but less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) For purposes of this section, “a final surcharge liability” means any final surcharge liability arising under Part 19 (commencing with Section 40001), or related
 interest, additions to surcharges, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part.

(c) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated from a business that has been discontinued or transferred, where the surcharge payer making the offer no longer has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business or has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued business.

(d) Offers in compromise shall not be considered where the surcharge payer has been convicted of felony tax evasion under this part during the liability period.

(e) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The surcharge payer shall
 establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the surcharge payer’s present assets or income.

(B) The surcharge payer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the surcharge payer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The board shall have determined that acceptance of the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

(f) A determination by the board that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final surcharge liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(g) (1) Offers for liabilities with a fraud or evasion penalty shall require a minimum offer of the unpaid surcharge and fraud or evasion penalty.

(2) The minimum offer may be waived if it can be shown that the surcharge payer making the offer was not the person responsible for perpetrating the fraud or evasion. This authorization to waive only applies to partnership accounts where the intent to commit fraud or evasion can be clearly attributed to a partner of the surcharge payer.

(h) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the board shall notify the surcharge payer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the
 surcharge payer.

(i) When more than one surcharge payer is liable for the debt, such as with spouses or partnerships or other business combinations, including, but not limited to, surcharge payers who are liable through dual determination or successor’s liability, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable surcharge payer shall reduce the amount of the liability of the other surcharge payers by the amount of the accepted offer.

(j) Whenever a compromise of surcharges or penalties or total surcharges and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the executive director of the board a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the
 surcharge payer.

(2) The amount of unpaid surcharges and related penalties, additions to surcharges, interest, or other amounts involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the surcharge payer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Section 40175. No list shall be prepared and no releases distributed by the board in connection with these statements.

(k) Any compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all
 compromised liabilities may be reestablished, without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable, and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The board determines that any person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the board any property belonging to the estate of any surcharge payer or other person liable for the surcharge.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified any book, document, or record or made any false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the surcharge payer or other person liable for the surcharge.

(2) The surcharge payer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions
 relative to the offer.

(l) Any person who, in connection with any offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from any officer or employee of this state any property belonging to the estate of a surcharge payer or other person liable in respect of the surcharge.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies any book, document, or record, or makes any false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the surcharge payer or other
 person liable in respect of the surcharge.

(m) For purposes of this section, “person” means the taxpayer, any member of the surcharge payer’s family, any corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or any other individual or entity acting on behalf of, the surcharge payer, or any other corporation or entity owned or controlled by the surcharge payer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the surcharge payer, directly or indirectly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 580.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

40212.

(a) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall release any levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part on any property in the event that the expense of the sale process exceeds the liability for which the levy is made.

(b) (1) (A) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order the
 release of any levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part or, within 90 days from the receipt of funds pursuant to a levy or notice to withhold, order the return of any amount up to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300) of moneys received, upon his or her finding that the levy or notice to withhold threatens the health or welfare of the taxpayer or his or her spouse and dependents or family.

(B) The amount the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may return to each taxpayer subject to a levy or notice to withhold, is limited to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300), or the adjusted amount as specified in paragraph (2), in any monthly period.

(C) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order amounts returned in the case of a seizure of property as a result of a jeopardy determination, subject to the amounts set or adjusted pursuant to this section and if the ultimate
 collection of the amount due is no longer in jeopardy.

(2) (A) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall adjust the two-thousand-three-hundred-dollar ($2,300) amount specified in paragraph (1) as follows:

(i) On or before March 1, 2016, and on or before March 1 each year thereafter, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall multiply the amount applicable for the current fiscal year by the inflation factor adjustment calculated based on the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index, as recorded by the California Department of Industrial Relations for the most recent year available, and the formula set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041. The resulting amount will be the applicable amount for the succeeding fiscal year only when the applicable amount computed is equal to or exceeds a new
 operative threshold, as defined in subparagraph (B).

(ii) When the applicable amount equals or exceeds an operative threshold specified in subparagraph (B), the resulting applicable amount, rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100), shall be operative for purposes of paragraph (1) beginning July 1 of the succeeding fiscal year.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “operative threshold” means an amount that exceeds by at least one hundred dollars ($100) the greater of either the amount specified in paragraph (1) or the amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) as the operative adjustment to the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(c) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall not sell any seized property until it first has notified the taxpayer in writing of the exemptions from
 levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), this section shall not apply to the seizure of any property as a result of a jeopardy determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 181, Sec. 5.   (SB 1507)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

40212.5.

(a) Except in any case where the board finds collection of the tax to be in jeopardy, if any property has been levied upon, the property or the proceeds from the sale of the property shall be returned to the taxpayer if the board determines any one of the following:

(1) The levy on the property was not in accordance with the law.

(2) The taxpayer has entered into and is in compliance with an installment
 payment agreement pursuant to Section 40167 to satisfy the tax liability for which the levy was imposed, unless that or another agreement allows for the levy.

(3) The return of the property will facilitate the collection of the tax liability or will be in the best interest of the state and the taxpayer.

(b) Property returned under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) is subject to the provisions of Section 40214.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

40213.

Exemptions from levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be adjusted for purposes of enforcing the collection of debts under this part to reflect changes in the California Consumer Price Index whenever the change is more than 5 percent higher than any previous adjustment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 165.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

40214.

(a) A taxpayer may file a claim with the board for reimbursement of bank charges and any other reasonable third-party check charge fees incurred by the taxpayer as the direct result of an erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action by the board. Bank and third-party charges include a financial institution’s or third party’s customary charge for
 complying with the levy or notice to withhold instructions and reasonable charges for overdrafts that are a direct consequence of the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action. The charges are those paid by the taxpayer and not waived or reimbursed by the financial institution or third party. Each claimant applying for reimbursement shall file a claim with the board that shall be in a form as may be prescribed by the board. In order for the board to grant a claim, the board shall determine that both of the following conditions have been satisfied:

(1) The erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action was caused by board error.
